Hawaii statutes.
§321-171.5 Employees of the department of
health, its providers and subcontractors; background checks. (a) The
department of health shall develop procedures for obtaining verifiable
background check information regarding persons who are seeking employment, or
seeking to serve as providers or subcontractors, in positions that place them
in direct contact with adult, child, or youth clients when providing
non-witnessed direct mental health or health care services. These procedures
shall include but not be limited to background checks as defined in section 321‑15.2.

(b) Except as otherwise specified, any person
who seeks employment with the department of health, or who is employed or seeks
employment with a provider or subcontractor in a position that necessitates
non-witnessed direct contact with clients when providing non-witnessed direct
mental health or health care services, shall:

(1) Be subject to background checks in accordance
with section 321‑15.2;

(2) Authorize the disclosure to the department or its
designee of background check information; and

(3) Provide to the department of health or its
designee written consent for the department or its designee to obtain
background check information for verification.

Information obtained pursuant to subsection (a) and
this subsection shall be used exclusively by the department of health for
purposes of determining whether a person is suitable for working in a position
that necessitates non-witnessed direct contact with clients when providing
non-witnessed direct mental health or health care services. All such decisions
shall be subject to federal laws and regulations currently or hereafter in
effect.

(c) The department of health may refuse to
employ or may terminate the employment of any employee or applicant for
employment if:

(1) The person refuses
to authorize the department or its designee to conduct a background check;

(2) The person refuses
or fails to submit to the department or its designee information required to
conduct a background check;

(3) The person has been
convicted of an offense for which incarceration is a sentencing option; or

(4) The department of
health finds by reason of the nature and circumstances of the background check
information that the person poses a risk to the health, safety, or well-being
of clients receiving non-witnessed direct mental health or health care
services. Such refusal or termination may occur only after appropriate
investigation, notification of results and planned action, and opportunity to
meet and rebut the finding, all of which need not be conducted in accordance
with chapter 91. Nothing in this subsection shall abrogate any applicable
appeal rights under chapter 76 or 89.

(d) This section shall not be used by the
department of health or its designee to secure background checks on persons who
have been employed continuously on a salaried basis prior to July 1, 2015.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit
background checks on employees of all providers and subcontractors.

(f) The department or its designee, in
obtaining and relying upon the background check information, shall be presumed
to be acting in good faith and shall be immune from civil liability for taking
or recommending action based upon the background check information. The presumption
of good faith may be rebutted upon a showing of proof by a preponderance of the
evidence that the department or its designee relied upon information or opinion
that it knew was false or misleading or that such reliance was not reasonable.

(g) For purposes of this section:

"Provider" means any organization or
individual that intends to enter into a contract with or is currently
contracted by the department of health to provide direct mental health or
health care services to the department's eligible clients.

"Subcontractor" means any
organization or individual that enters into a contract or agreement with a
provider to provide direct mental health or health care services to the
department's eligible clients.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the department of health shall be exempt from section 831-3.1 for
purposes of this section and need not conduct investigations, notifications, or
hearings under this section in accordance with chapter 91. [L 2003, c 95, §5;
am L 2004, c 79, §1; am L 2012, c 285, §3; am L 2015, c 190, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next